Utah statutes.
4-17-3.   Commissioner -- Functions, powers, and duties.

The commissioner has the following powers and duties:

(1)  investigates and designates noxious weeds on a statewide basis;

(2)  compiles and publishes annually a list of statewide noxious weeds;

(3)  coordinates and assists in inter-county noxious weed enforcement activities;

(4)  determines whether each county complies with this chapter;

(5)  assists a county which fails to carry out the provisions of this chapter in its implementation of a weed control program;

(6)  prescribes the form and general substantive content of notices to the public and to individuals concerning the prevention and control of noxious weeds;

(7)  compiles and publishes a list of articles capable of disseminating noxious weeds or seeds and designate treatment to prevent dissemination; and

(8)  regulates the flow of contaminated articles into the state and between counties to prevent the dissemination of noxious weeds or seeds.



Amended by Chapter 18, 1985 General Session

